Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF697.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 3 TLSB 2598HV (1) 91 th/ns H.F. 697 Section 1. Section 321I.14, subsection 3, paragraph b, Code 1 2025, is amended to read as follows: 2 b. Paragraph âaâ does not apply to a person who operates an 3 all-terrain vehicle as part of a farm operation as defined in 4 section 352.2 , or a person who operates an all-terrain vehicle 5 modified to carry no more than one additional person so long 6 as the modification is an aftermarket product or original 7 equipment manufacturer product that is both specifically 8 designed to carry a person as a passenger on the type of 9 all-terrain vehicle to which the product is secured and is 10 manufactured for commercial sale . 11